Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 2 Business and Industrial Development Corporations
45-8-221. Privileged and confidential information — Disclosures.

The information that is obtained by the commissioner, or any financial institutions examiner, in making an examination into the affairs of the BIDCO, shall be for the purpose of ascertaining the true condition of the affairs of the BIDCO, shall be privileged and confidential, shall not be subject to subpoena, and shall not be disclosed by the party making the examination to any person, except that the examiner shall report the condition of the affairs of the BIDCO to the commissioner, and except that the commissioner is authorized to make the following disclosures from reports of examinations and any information related to the examination of the BIDCO:

Within the department in the course of official duties;

To the United States department of justice, federal bureau of investigation, Tennessee bureau of investigation or state district attorneys general in the case of any criminal violation discovered during the course of an examination;

In any administrative proceeding or court action initiated by the commissioner or the department or to which the commissioner is an actual party;

To the directors of a BIDCO;

To the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee for the purpose of an audit of the department; provided, that neither this section nor § 10-7-508 shall allow the comptroller or the comptroller's designee a right of access to the names of debtors or other persons listed in the report of an examination of a BIDCO;

To the state treasurer, commissioner of finance and administration, and commissioner of economic and community development when disclosure is in the best interest of the state; and

To other states' financial institutions' regulatory agencies that have authority to regulate BIDCOs in their states.

Disclosures made under subsection (a) shall be made under safeguards designed to prevent further dissemination of confidential information. If any agency or department that has received confidential information under subsection (a) receives a valid subpoena to produce documents of the department of financial institutions, or desires to use the documents in litigation including, but not limited to, discovery proceedings, in which it is involved, the agency or department shall notify the department for permission to produce the documents. The commissioner has the discretion to authorize the requesting agency or department to use the documents under a protective order approved by the commissioner and designed to prevent the unnecessary further dissemination of the documents.

A BIDCO may reproduce all, or any part of, a report of examination and send or deliver the reproduction to a holding company of which it is a subsidiary.

As used in this section, “subsidiary” means:

Any company twenty-five percent (25%) or more of whose voting shares, excluding shares owned by the United States or by any company wholly owned by the United States, is directly or indirectly owned or controlled by the holding company, or is held by it with power to vote;

Any company the election of a majority of whose directors is controlled in any manner by the holding company; or

Any company with respect to the management or policies of which the holding company has the power, directly or indirectly, to exercise a controlling influence, as determined by the commissioner, after notice and opportunity for hearing.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, the commissioner may, in the commissioner's discretion and in the interest of justice, and when under a validly issued subpoena, waive the privilege created herein and produce examination reports of BIDCOs and other related documents under a protection order entered by a court or administrative tribunal of competent jurisdiction where the order is designed to protect the confidential nature of the information so disclosed from public dissemination.

Acts 1989, ch. 124, § 21; 2013, ch. 211, § 7.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

45-8-222. Prohibited acts.

For the purposes of this section:

A person who is in a relationship referred to in this section within six (6) months before or after a licensee provides financing assistance shall be considered to be in that relationship as of the date that licensee provides that financing assistance; and

If a licensee, in order to protect its interest, designates a person to serve as a director of, officer of, or in any capacity in the management of a business firm to which that licensee provides financing assistance, that person shall not, on that account, be considered to have a relationship with that business firm.

A person shall not willfully make an untrue statement of a material fact in an application or report filed with the commissioner under this part, or willfully omit to state in the application or report a material fact required to be stated in the application or report.

A person having custody of any of the books, accounts, or other records of a licensee shall not willfully refuse to allow the commissioner, upon request, to inspect or make copies of any of those books, accounts or other records.

A person shall not, with intent to deceive a director, officer, employee, auditor or attorney of a licensee, the commissioner, or a governmental agency:

Make a false entry in the books, accounts or other records of the licensee;

Omit to make an entry in those books, accounts or other records that the person is required to make; or

Alter, conceal, or destroy any of those books, accounts or other records.

A licensee shall not provide, directly or indirectly, financing assistance to an associate of the licensee.

A licensee shall not provide, directly or indirectly, financing assistance to discharge, or to free other money for use in discharging, in whole or in part, an obligation to an associate of that licensee. This subsection (f) does not apply to a transaction effected by an associate of a licensee in the normal course of that associate's business involving a line of credit or short-term financing assistance.

It is unlawful for any person to serve as an officer or director of a BIDCO who:

Has been convicted of an offense constituting a violation of the BIDCO laws, a felony or a breach of trust in the jurisdiction where the judgment was rendered;

Is indebted to the BIDCO for more than thirty (30) days upon a judgment that has become final.

It is unlawful for an affiliate of a BIDCO, or for an officer, director or employee of a BIDCO or affiliate of a BIDCO, to willfully and knowingly and without authority from the board of directors or governing body of the BIDCO, to receive, consent to receive, or agree to receive, any commission, emolument, gratuity, or reward, or any promise of any commission, emolument, or reward, property or thing of value or of personal advantage, for procuring or endeavoring to procure for any person a loan or any other investment by the BIDCO.

Any director of a BIDCO who concurs in any vote or act of the directors of the BIDCO by which it is intended to:

Make a dividend except from the surplus profits arising from the business of the BIDCO;

Divide, withdraw or in any manner pay to the stockholders or any of them any part of the stock of the BIDCO, or to reduce the stock except in pursuance of law;

Discount or receive any note, or other evidence of debt in payment of stock required to be paid or with intention to provide the means of making the payment;

Receive or discount any note or other evidence of debt with the intent to enable any stockholder to withdraw any part of the money paid in as consideration for the purchase of stock; or

Apply any portion of the funds of the BIDCO except as allowed by law, directly or indirectly, to the purchase of shares of its own stock.

Acts 1989, ch. 124, § 22.

Compiler's Notes. The language in subsection (i) reads as enacted by Acts 1989, ch. 124, § 22.

45-8-223. Intentional violators — Penalties.

A person who knowingly commits an act that violates § 45-8-222 commits a Class A misdemeanor.

This section does not apply to an act committed or omitted in good faith in conformity with an order or rule of the commissioner, notwithstanding that order or rule is later amended, rescinded, or repealed, or determined by judicial or other authority to be invalid for any reason.

Nothing in this part limits the power of the state to punish a person for an act that constitutes a crime under any statute.

Acts 1989, ch. 124, § 23; 1989, ch. 591, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

The misdemeanor in this section has been designated as a Class A misdemeanor by authority of §40-35-110, which provides that an offense designated a misdemeanor without specifications as to category is a Class A misdemeanor. See also §39-11-114.

Cross-References. Civil penalties, §45-8-219.

Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

45-8-224. Report of criminal violations.

It is the duty of the BIDCO to submit to the commissioner a report of any apparent criminal violation known by it to have occurred. The commissioner shall submit to the district attorneys general of the respective judicial districts reports of apparent violations of laws. The commissioner shall also report the violation to the appropriate division of the Tennessee bureau of investigation.

Acts 1989, ch. 124, § 24.

45-8-225. Report of accomplishments.

The commissioner shall publish annually and provide to the governor and to each member of the general assembly a report that summarizes the department's accomplishments under this part in promoting economic development in this state. At the minimum, the information shall include aggregate statistics on each of the following:

The number and dollar amount of provisions of financing assistance made by licensees to business firms;

The number and dollar amount of provisions of financing assistance made by licensees to business firms classified in broad categories of industry such as divisions of the standard industrial classification manual;

The number and dollar amount of provisions of financing assistance made by licensees to minority owned business firms and to female owned business firms; and

Estimates of the number of jobs created or retained.

Acts 1989, ch. 124, § 26.

Cross-References. Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, §3-1-114.

45-8-226. Inapplicability of § 45-8-212 to well capitalized licensee.

The requirements of §45-8-212 shall not be applicable to a well capitalized licensee; provided, that within thirty (30) days of ceasing to be well capitalized, a licensee must apply for commissioner approval in order to retain any business acquired without the commissioner's prior approval.

Acts 1997, ch. 131, § 8.